Utah statutes.
11-44-302.   Annual reports.

During the term of an energy savings agreement, the qualified energy service provider shall submit an annual report to the political subdivision that provides the cost savings attributable to the energy efficiency measures taken by the political subdivision.



Enacted by Chapter 244, 2010 General Session

